South Dakota, session 2026, SB193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 49-41B-2 be AMENDED:
49-41B-2. Terms as used in this chapter mean:
(1) "AC/DC conversion facility," an asynchronous AC to DC to AC tie that is directly
connected to a transmission facility or a facility that connects an AC transmission
facility with a DC transmission facility, or vice versa;
(2) "Associated facilities," aqueducts, cooling ponds, diversion dams, reservoirs,
storage ponds, or transmission substations, storage ponds, reservoirs, or cooling
ponds;
(3) "Backup electric generation," electric generation that is not interconnected with the
grid and is generated on a temporary basis to replace primary source electric
generation when the primary source is unavailable;
(4) "Carbon dioxide," a fluid that consists of more than ninety percent carbon dioxide
molecules compressed in a supercritical state;
(4)(5) "Commission," the Public Utilities Commission of the State of South Dakota;
(5)(6) "Construction," any clearing of land, excavation, or other action that would affect
the environment of the site for each any land or rights of way right-of-way upon
or over which a facility may be constructed or modified, but not including activities
incident to preliminary engineering or environmental studies. This term includes
modifications to including the modification of facilities as defined described in § 49-
41B-2.2, but not including any activity incident to preliminary engineering or an
environmental study;
(6)(7) "Energy conversion facility," any new facility, or facility expansion, designed for or
capable of generation of one hundred megawatts or more of electricity, but does
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

193C 2 193
not include any wind or solar energy facilities that are designed for or capable of
generating one hundred megawatts or more of electricity. This term includes
including a hybrid facility capable of injecting one hundred megawatts or more of
electricity into the transmission or distribution system, but not including:
(a) Any solar or wind energy facility that is designed for or capable of
generating one hundred megawatts or more of electricity; or
(b) Backup electric generation;
(7)(8) "Facility," any AC/DC conversion facility, energy conversion facility, solar energy
facility, transmission facility, or wind energy facility, and associated facilities;
(8)(9) "Facility expansion," the addition of twenty-five megawatts AC or more of
generation capacity to an existing generation source resulting in a combined
megawatt capability of the new and existing generation of one hundred megawatts
AC or more of electricity;
(9)(10) "Hybrid facility," a new facility, or a facility expansion, comprised of more than
one type of generation source and having a single point of interconnection to the
distribution or transmission system;
(10)(11) "Permit," the a permit, issued by the commission under pursuant to this
chapter, which is required for the construction and operation of a facility;
(11)(12) "Person," an individual, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, cooperative, firm, government agency,
individual, joint venture, limited liability company, municipal corporation,
partnership, political subdivision, private or public corporation, public service
company, cooperative, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, or any other public or private entity, however
organized;
(12)(13) "Siting area," that the area within ten miles, in any direction, of a proposed
energy conversion facility, AC/DC conversion facility, energy conversion facility, or
any other area determined by the commission to be affected by a proposed energy
conversion facility;
(13)(14) "Solar energy facility," a new facility, or facility expansion, consisting of a
commonly managed integrated system of solar panels, power collection systems,
electric interconnection systems, and associated facilities, that which converts solar
energy into electricity and is designed for or capable of generating one hundred
megawatts AC or more of electricity;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

193C 3 193
(14)(15) "Trans-state transmission facility," an electric transmission line, and its
associated facilities that, which:
(a) Originates outside of this state, crosses this state, and terminates outside
of this state; and
(b) Delivers electric power and energy of twenty-five percent or less of the
design capacity of the line and facilities for use in this state;
(15)(16) "Utility," any person engaged in and controlling the generation or transmission
of electric energy and gas or liquid transmission facilities, as defined by described
in § 49-41B-2.1; and
(16)(17) "Wind energy facility," a new facility, or facility expansion, consisting of a
commonly managed integrated system of towers, wind turbine generators with
blades, power collection systems, and electric interconnection systems, that which
converts wind movement into electricity and that is designed for or capable of
generation of one hundred megawatts or more of electricity.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 49-41B:
A backup electric generation facility may not be interconnected to the bulk electric
system without first obtaining a permit under this chapter as an energy conversion facility.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.